Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1590
Facility, defined.

Facility shall mean the land, building, and equipment selected pursuant to the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact and used or to be used for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 4.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.